Utah statutes.
56-1-26.   Violations -- Penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation operating or controlling any railroad running through or within this state using or permitting to be used on its line in this state a track motor car in violation of the provisions of this act shall be liable to a penalty of one hundred dollars for each violation to be recovered in a suit or suits to be brought by the prosecuting attorney in the district court of the county having jurisdiction in the locality where such violation occurred.

